vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
ŧitimamente/FSṾèW0	po:adverb
đal/M0ɃƚěSět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
mòra/F0ělěƚětǒt	po:noun is:singular_femenine
arte/M0v1	po:noun is:singular_masculine
dente/M0FS.0Ṿrv1ǎSǎsělěƚⱣd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
dexiderativo/A1FSWa	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
đenòco/M0FSělǒn	po:noun is:singular_masculine
fameja/F0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
fasin/M0ělěƚǒt	po:noun is:singular_masculine
fiƚo/M0ǎᶊěƚěŧ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
kal/M0v1ět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
kanèla/F0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
koɉona/ǎtělěƚět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
kolor/F0v1ǎSǎsǐnⱣd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
kopa/F0ělěƚět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
kopuƚativo/A1Wⱥ	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
leterario/A1Wa	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
liberamente/FSW0	po:adverb
ƚatin/M0ěŧ	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
ƚokutivo/A1Wⱥ	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
mòda/F0v1ělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
mura/F0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
ninsiòƚo/M0ěŧ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
paƚaseto/v1M0Ᵽd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
piana/F0Waělěƚětǒt	po:noun is:singular_femenine
piato/M0ělěƚǐn	po:noun is:singular_masculine
similmente/FSW0	po:adverb
soƚivo/A1Wⱥ	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
sotrativo/A1FSWa	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
stua/F0v1ětǒt	po:noun is:singular_femenine
triveƚin/M0ěŧ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
vèco/M0FSǎSǎsětǐnǒNǒt‘0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
artexan/M0Ƀlǎsělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
figura/F0v1ǎSǎsětǒt	po:noun is:singular_femenine
fornaxa/F0ělěƚět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
gaƚante/M0Wⱥv0	po:adjective is:singular
ƚadra/F0ěŧ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
manto/M0FSělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
manxo/M0ǎtět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
muƚa/F0ǎᶊěŧ	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
putana/F0ǎSǎsělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
resipiloxo/A1FSWaⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
stradèƚa/F0ěŧǐn	po:noun is:singular_femenine
xbrindoƚoxo/A1WⱥⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
bolson/F0Ƀl*0ělěƚⱣd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
medegamente/FSW0	po:adverb
vena/F0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
kademegamente/FSW0@0	po:adverb
ƚevada/F0Y0.0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
malankonioxo/A1FSWaⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
morevolmente/FSW0	po:adverb
nebuƚoxo/A1WⱥⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
soliŧitamente/FSW0	po:adverb
soran/M0Ƀlělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
pedada/F0Y0Y1*0ǐn	po:noun is:singular_femenine
maga/F0ělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
ranaroxo/A1FSWaⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
kamèƚo/M0ěŧǒŧ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
ƚeriɉoxo/A1WⱥⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
fiƚoxomía/F0v1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
aƚarme/M0v1	po:noun is:singular_masculine
antena/F0ělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
avaliamente/FSW0	po:adverb
bòŧo/M0FSělětǒn	po:noun is:singular_masculine
car/M0^6ět	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
faturoxo/A1FSWaⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
fiƚoxo/M0Wⱥ*0ǒÑⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
infamemente/FSW0	po:adverb
korbato/M0FSělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
maraveɉoxo/A1FSWa*0Ᵽd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
masèƚa/F0ěŧ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
ponta/F0ǎSǎsělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
portabòŧa/F0ět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
provixoriamente/FSW0	po:adverb
sabionoxo/A1FSWaⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
soƚidaƚe/F0Wⱥ	po:adjective is:singular
stortada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
subiada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
ŧifra/F0Ṿèv1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
viscoxo/A1FSWaⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
visin/M0r0ělěƚ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
sintura/F0ělěƚět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
citina/F0ět	po:noun is:singular_femenine
buxarada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
indoƚentrada/F0Y0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
inđakolada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
maistraƚada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
milantada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
raɉada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
sasoƚoxo/A1WⱥⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
spetorado/M0FSY0	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
sprotada/F0Y0Y1	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
urlada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
xbraɉada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
skarpelado/M0FSY0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
xbonboƚada/F0Y0Y1	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
pikoƚado/M0Y0	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
konkruxivo/A1FSWa	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
infagotada/F0Y0	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
traskurada/F0Y0	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
pipada/F0Y0Y1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
maƚuxo/M0ěŧ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
